Illinois, session 104th, SB3091.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 110-2 and 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-2)7    Sec. 110-2. Pretrial release. 8    (a) All persons charged with an offense shall be eligible 9for pretrial release before conviction. It is presumed that a 10defendant is entitled to release on personal recognizance on 11the condition that the defendant attend all required court 12proceedings and the defendant does not commit any criminal 13offense, and complies with all terms of pretrial release, 14including, but not limited to, orders of protection under both 15Section 112A-4 of this Code and Section 214 of the Illinois 16Domestic Violence Act of 1986, all civil no contact orders, 17and all stalking no contact orders. Pretrial release may be 18denied only if a person is charged with an offense listed in 19Section 110-6.1 and after the court has held a hearing under 20Section 110-6.1, and in a manner consistent with subsections 21(b), (c), and (d) of this Section. 22    (b) At all pretrial hearings, the prosecution shall have 23the burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that any   SB3091- 2 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1condition of release is necessary.2    (c) When it is alleged that pretrial release should be 3denied to a person upon the grounds that the person presents a 4real and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 5or the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 6the case, the burden of proof of such allegations shall be upon 7the State.8    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d-1), when 9When it is alleged that pretrial release should be denied to a 10person charged with stalking or aggravated stalking upon the 11grounds set forth in Section 110-6.3, the burden of proof of 12those allegations shall be upon the State. 13    (d-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 14Section, if the defendant is charged with a violation of 15Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 16involving the manufacture or delivery, or possession with 17intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 18counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog of 15 19grams or more of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 20thereof, then the burden of proof is on the defendant to show 21by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant's pretrial 22release does not pose a real and present threat to the safety 23of any person or persons or the community, based on the 24specific articulable facts of the case. 25    (e) This Section shall be liberally construed to 26effectuate the purpose of relying on pretrial release by   SB3091- 3 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1nonmonetary means to reasonably ensure an eligible person's 2appearance in court, the protection of the safety of any other 3person or the community, that the person will not attempt or 4obstruct the criminal justice process, and the person's 5compliance with all conditions of release, while authorizing 6the court, upon motion of a prosecutor, to order pretrial 7detention of the person under Section 110-6.1 when it finds 8clear and convincing evidence that no condition or combination 9of conditions can reasonably ensure the effectuation of these 10goals.11(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 12    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)13    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 14    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 15hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 16if:17        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 18    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 19    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 20    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 21    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 22    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 23    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 24    or persons or the community, based on the specific 25    articulable facts of the case;  SB3091- 4 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 2    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 3    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 4    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 5    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 6    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 7    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 8    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 9    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 10    of force against another person, residential burglary, 11    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 12    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 13    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 14    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 15    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 16    disability or disfigurement; 17        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 18    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 19    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 20    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 21    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 22    of the threat upon which the charge is based;23        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 24    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 25    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 26    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of   SB3091- 5 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 2    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 3    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 4    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 5    or persons or the community, based on the specific 6    articulable facts of the case;7        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 8    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 9    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 10    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 11    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 12    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 13    case;14        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 15    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 16    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 17    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 18    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 19    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 20    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 21    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 22    the case; 23        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 24    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 25    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 26    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons   SB3091- 6 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 2    of the case:3            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 4        firearm);5            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 6        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 7        designed or used for silencing the report of a 8        firearm);9            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 10        firearm);11            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 12        firearm by a repeat felony offender);13            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 14        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 15        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 16        or flechette shells);17            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 18        firearms);19            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 20        firearms on the premises of any school);21            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 22        liquor license);23            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 24        firearm);25            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);26            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);  SB3091- 7 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);2            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 3        of a minor);4            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);5            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 6        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 7        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 8        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 9        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 10        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 11            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 12        manslaughter);13            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);14            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);15            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 16        endangerment);17            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 18            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 19        restraint); 20            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 21            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 22        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 23        discharge of a firearm); 24        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 25    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 26    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the   SB3091- 8 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 2    the specific articulable facts of the case: 3            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 4        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 5        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);6            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence while operating a school bus with 9        passengers);10            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence causing great bodily harm);13            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence after a previous reckless homicide 16        conviction);17            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence leading to death); or20            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 22        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 23        under the age of 16);24        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 25    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 26    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a   SB3091- 9 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 2    persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case; or 4        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 5    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:6            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 7        through (a)(7) of this Section; or8            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 9    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 10detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 11probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 12a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 13been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 14indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 15probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 16finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 17misdemeanor.18    (c) Timing of petition. 19        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 20    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 21    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 22    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 23    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 24    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 25    previously released shall not be detained.26        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a   SB3091- 10 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 2    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 3    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 4    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 5    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 6    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 7    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 8    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 9    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 10    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 11    filing of the petition and the hearing.12    (d) Contents of petition.13        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 14    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 15    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 16    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 17    persons or the community, based on the specific 18    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.19        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 20    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 21    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 22    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 23    filing of the previous petition.24    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 25for pretrial release, and except as otherwise provided in 26subsection (e-1), the State shall bear the burden of proving   SB3091- 11 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1by clear and convincing evidence that:2        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 3    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 4    subsection (a), and5        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 6    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 7    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 8    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 9    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 10    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 11    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 12    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 13    1986, and14        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 15    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 16    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 17    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 18    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 19    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 20    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 21    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and22        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 23    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 24    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 25    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 26    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and   SB3091- 12 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 2    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 3    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 4    appear in court as required.5    (e-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 6Section, if the defendant is charged with a violation of 7Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 8involving the manufacture or delivery, or possession with 9intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 10counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog of 15 11grams or more of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 12thereof, then the burden of proof is on the defendant to show 13by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant's pretrial 14release does not pose a real and present threat to the safety 15of any person or persons or the community, based on the 16specific articulable facts of the case. 17    (f) Conduct of the hearings.18        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 19    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 20    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 21    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 22    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 23    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 24    hearing.25        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 26    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.  SB3091- 13 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 2    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 3    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 4    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 5    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 6    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 7    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 8    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 9    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 10    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 11    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 12    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 13    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system, 14    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 15    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 16        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 17    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 18    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 19    right to be present physically in court, the court 20    determines that the physical health and safety of any 21    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 22    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 23    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in 24    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 25    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 26    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges   SB3091- 14 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 2    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 3    6 months. 4        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 5    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 6    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 7    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 8    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 9    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 10    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 11    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 12    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 13    the court shall state on the record the reason for 14    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 15    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 16    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 17    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 18    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 19    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 20    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 21    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 22    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 23    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 24    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 25    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 26    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery   SB3091- 15 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 2    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 3    criminal history, if available, and any written or 4    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 5    statements made by any person, if in the State's 6    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 7        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 8    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 9    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 10    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 11    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 12    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 13    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 14    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 15    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.16        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 17    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 18    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 19    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 20    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 21    the defendant.22        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 23    release, and detention prior to trial must be 24    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 25    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 26    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release.   SB3091- 16 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 2dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 3defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 4person or persons or the community, based on the specific 5articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 6limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:7        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 8    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 9    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.10        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 11    including:12            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 13        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 14        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 15        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 16        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 17        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.18            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 19        psychiatric or other similar social history which 20        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 21        nature, or lack of any such history.22        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 23    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 24    nature of the threat.25        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 26    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding   SB3091- 17 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1    them.2        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.3        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 4    complaining witness. 5        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 6    access to any weapon or weapons.7        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 8    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 9    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 10    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 11    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 12    federal or State law.13        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 14    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 15    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 16    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 17    or lack of such behavior.18    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 19detention:20        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 21    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 22    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 23    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 24    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 25    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 26    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;  SB3091- 18 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 2    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 3    pending trial;4        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 5    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 6    communication with others of his or her choice by 7    visitation, mail and telephone; and8        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 9    required for appearances in connection with court 10    proceedings.11    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 12detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 13Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 14offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 15on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 16is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 17the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 18release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 19any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 20the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 21from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 22good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.23    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 24before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 25is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 26of any person or persons or the community, based on the   SB3091- 19 -LRB104 18936 RLC 32381 b1specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 2defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 3    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 4entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 5denying his or her pretrial release.6    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 7this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 8release.9    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 10shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 11defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 12proceedings.13    (m) Interest of victims. 14        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 15    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 16    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 17    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 18    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 19        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 20    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 21    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 22    defendant remains in custody. 23(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)